Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.56.640

Certificate of nomination—Requisites.

A certificate evidencing nominations made at a convention must:

(1) Be in writing;

(2) Contain the name of each person nominated, his or her residence, the office for which he or she is named, and a sworn statement from both nominees giving their consent to the nomination;

(3) Identify the minor political party or the independent candidate on whose behalf the convention was held;

(4) Be verified by the oath of the presiding officer and secretary;

(5) Be accompanied by a nominating petition or petitions bearing the signatures and addresses of at least one thousand registered voters of the state of Washington;

(6) Contain proof of publication of the notice of calling the convention; and

(7) Be submitted to the secretary of state not later than the first Friday of August.

[ 2013 c 11 s 28; 2004 c 271 s 154. Formerly RCW 29A.20.161.]